public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((a|as|de|des|es|kon|pro|re|so)tràer)
# themeT1 + er/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/b0b1b2o0J0
# themeT8 + o/o0J0
SFX o0 Y 81
SFX o0 aerò emo/E0E1E2J0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò en/J0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò on/E0E1E2J0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò one/K0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò onme/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 aerò à/E0E1E2 aerò
SFX o0 aerò àrmene/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 aerò è/F0F1F2N0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò ème/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 aerò èmene/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 aerò èu/O0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò é/F0F1F2N0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò éu/O0 aerò
SFX o0 aerò ò aerò
SFX o0 aerò ónmene/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 er gene/K0 àer
SFX o0 er gone/K0 àer
SFX o0 er ime/G0G1G2 er
SFX o0 er ímene/G0G1G2 er
SFX o0 erò ga erò
SFX o0 erò gi/F0F1F2L0 erò
SFX o0 erò go/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò r/E0E1E2 erò
SFX o0 erò rave/F0F1F2Q1Q2 erò
SFX o0 erò re erò
SFX o0 erò remo/E0E1E2J0 erò
SFX o0 erò ren/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò rense erò
SFX o0 erò resi/N0 erò
SFX o0 erò resiu/O0 erò
SFX o0 erò rimo/E0E1E2J0 erò
SFX o0 erò rion/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò rione/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò rionse erò
SFX o0 erò risen/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò risense erò
SFX o0 erò risi/N0 erò
SFX o0 erò rision/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò risione/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò risionse erò
SFX o0 erò risiu/O0 erò
SFX o0 erò risié/N0 erò
SFX o0 erò risiéu/O0 erò
SFX o0 erò rison/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò risone/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò risonse erò
SFX o0 erò rié/N0 erò
SFX o0 erò riéu/O0 erò
SFX o0 erò rme/G0G1G2 erò
SFX o0 erò ron/E0E1E2J0 erò
SFX o0 erò rone/K0 aerò
SFX o0 erò ronme/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 erò rà/F0F1F2J0L0 erò
SFX o0 erò ràe/F0F1F2 erò
SFX o0 erò ràvelo/B0 erò
SFX o0 erò ràvene/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò ràveƚo/B0 erò
SFX o0 erò rè/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò rène/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò ré/N0 erò
SFX o0 erò résimo/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò résimoe/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò résitu/M0 erò
SFX o0 erò réu/O0 erò
SFX o0 erò rí/N0 erò
SFX o0 erò ría/F0F1F2J0L0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríane/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríatu/M0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríe/F0F1F2J0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríelo/B0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríene/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríeƚo/B0 erò
SFX o0 erò rísitu/M0 erò
SFX o0 erò ríu/O0 erò
SFX o0 erò rò/J0 erò
SFX o0 erò ròe/K0 erò
SFX o0 erò rónmene/G0G1G2 aerò
SFX o0 o 0/E0E1E2F0F1F2L0 io
SFX o0 o a/E0E1E2 o
SFX o0 o e/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 o
SFX o0 o i/E0E1E2F0F1F2L0 [^i]o
