public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
tràer/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2s0s1+0.0,0@0:0
trao/o0J0+0
atrào/o0J0
astràer/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2
detrào/o0J0
estràer/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2s0s1
estraerò/b0b1b2o0J0
estrào/o0J0
kontrào/o0J0
protràer/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2
protraerò/b0b1b2o0J0
protrào/o0J0
retrào/o0J0
sotràer/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2
sotrào/o0J0
subtràer/b0b1b2o0E0E1E2
subtrào/o0J0
